Maryland, session 2025, SB0005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
31–107.
(a) There is a Maryland Health Benefit Exchange Fund.
(b) (1) The purpose of the Fund is to:
(i) provide funding for the operation and administration of the
Exchange in carrying out the purposes of the Exchange under this subtitle;
– 1 –

Ch. 722 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) provide funding for the establishment and operation of the State
Reinsurance Program authorized under this subtitle;
(iii) provide funding for the Medical Assistance Program and the
Senior Prescription Drug Assistance Program;
(iv) provide funding for the establishment and operation of Health
Equity Resource Communities under Title 20, Subtitle 14 of the Health – General Article;
and
(v) provide funding for the establishment and operation of the
State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program authorized under
this subtitle.
(2) The operation and administration of the Exchange, the State
Reinsurance Program, the State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot]
Program, and the Qualified Resident Enrollment Program may include functions delegated
by the Exchange to a third party under law or by contract.
(f) (1) The Fund may be used only:
(iv) for the establishment and operation of the State–Based Young
Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program.
(g) (1) The Board shall maintain separate accounts within the Fund for
Exchange operations, for the State Reinsurance Program, and for the State–Based Young
Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program.
31–122.
(a) In this section, [“Pilot Program”] “PROGRAM” means the State–Based Young
Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program.
(b) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Exchange, in consultation with the Commissioner and as approved by the Board, [shall]
MAY establish and implement a State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies
[Pilot] Program to provide subsidies to young adults for the purchase of health benefit plans
in the individual health insurance market.
(2) THE EXCHANGE MAY NOT IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM FOR
CALENDAR YEARS IN WHICH FUNDS FROM THE DISTRIBUTION OF THE ASSESSMENT
UNDER § 6–102.1 OF THIS ARTICLE ARE NOT AVAILABLE.
(c) The [Pilot] Program required under this section shall be designed to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 722
(1) reduce the amount that young adults pay for health benefit plans in the
individual health insurance market; and
(2) target young adults who are not directly impacted by the State
Reinsurance Program.
(d) (1) [For calendar years 2022 through 2025] FOR EACH CALENDAR YEAR,
the Exchange, in consultation with the Commissioner and as approved by the Board, shall
establish subsidy eligibility and payment parameters for the [Pilot] Program.
(2) In determining the subsidy eligibility and payment parameters
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Exchange shall consider:
(i) young adults at least 18 years old and under the age of 41 years;
and
(ii) income groups between 133% and 400% of the federal poverty
level.
(e) (1) Subject to available funds and paragraph (2) of this subsection, in each
[of] fiscal [years 2022 through 2026] YEAR, the Exchange may designate funds from the
Fund to be used for the [Pilot] Program so that annual subsidies may be provided to young
adults who meet the subsidy eligibility and payment parameters established under
subsection (d) of this section.
(2) (I) For each of calendar years 2024 and 2025, the funds designated
under paragraph (1) of this subsection may not exceed $20,000,000 plus any unspent funds
designated for subsidies for young adults in a previous calendar year.
(II) FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2026 AND EACH CALENDAR YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE EXCHANGE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSIONER, MAY
DESIGNATE FUNDS FROM THE FUND TO PROVIDE ANNUAL SUBSIDIES TO YOUNG
ADULTS WHO MEET THE SUBSIDY ELIGIBILITY AND PAYMENT PARAMETERS
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(f) The Exchange shall adopt regulations implementing the provisions of this
section.
(g) The Exchange shall adopt regulations to provide a subsidy to cover 100% of
the cost of the premium for young adults who have a 0% expected contribution under the
subsidy eligibility parameters established under subsection (d) of this section.
(h) (1) The Exchange shall track on a monthly basis expenditures on subsidies
provided under the [Pilot] Program, including:
– 3 –

Ch. 722 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the average number of young adults receiving subsidies under
the [Pilot] Program; and
(ii) the average subsidy amount received by young adults under the
[Pilot] Program.
(2) The Exchange shall track:
(i) the impact the [Pilot] Program has on rates in the individual
insurance market; and
(ii) the impact of covering 100% of the cost of premiums for qualified
participants on effectuation rates and termination for nonpayment rates.
(3) The information tracked by the Exchange under paragraphs (1) and (2)
of this subsection shall be:
(i) posted on the website of the Exchange; and
(ii) included in the annual report required under § 31–119(d) of this
subtitle.
Chapter 778 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapters 256 and 257 of the Acts
of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2021. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2026,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –